Maine, session 132, LD276.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §13155, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 215, §6 and c. 411,
§8, is further amended to read:
3. Application and issuance. The commissioner, or an agent designated by the
commissioner, may register and assign a registration number to an ATV upon application
and payment of a fee by the owner. A copy of the signed form under section 13161,
subsection 1-A must be supplied by the owner in order to register an ATV. The
commissioner shall charge a fee of $1 in addition to the fee for each registration issued by
an employee of the department. The registration number in the form of stickers issued by
the commissioner must be clearly displayed on the front and rear of the vehicle. An annual
registration is valid for one year commencing July 1st of each year, except that any
registration issued prior to July 1st but after May 1st is valid from the date of issuance until
June 30th of the following year. A registration agent shall provide to the person who
requests to register an oversized ATV under subsection 5‑B a written form developed and
provided by the department explaining the size and weight restrictions for registering that
ATV, including whether it qualifies for registration, and explaining the provisions of
section 13157‑A regarding the operation of oversized ATVs on designated state-approved
ATV trails. The department shall develop a form for use by registration agents under this
subsection.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §13161, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 215, §12, is
amended to read:
1-A. Dealer to provide registration information. A dealer may not sell a new or
used oversized ATV without providing to the purchaser a written form developed and
provided by the department explaining the size and weight restrictions for registering that
ATV under section 13155, subsection 5‑B and the provisions of section 13157‑A regarding
the use of oversized ATVs on designated state-approved ATV trails. The department shall
develop a form for use by dealers under this section, which must include a check box, to
be filled out by the dealer, indicating whether the ATV is oversized or not, and a place for
a purchaser to sign acknowledging receipt of the form. The dealer shall provide the
Page 1 - 132LR2067(03)

purchaser and the department with a copy of the signed form after the sale. For purposes
of this subsection, "oversized ATV" has the same meaning as defined in section 13155,
subsection 5‑B.
Page 2 - 132LR2067(03)